Utah statutes.
76-10-3104.   Illegal anticompetitive activities.

(1)  Every contract, combination in the form of trust or otherwise, or conspiracy in restraint of trade or commerce is declared to be illegal.

(2)  It shall be unlawful for any person to monopolize, or attempt to monopolize, or combine or conspire with any other person or persons to monopolize, any part of trade or commerce.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 187, 2013 General Session

